Utah statutes.
48-2a-305 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Inspection of records -- Right to information.

(1)  Each limited partner has the right to:

(a)  inspect and copy any of the partnership records required to be maintained by Section 48-2a-105;

(b)  obtain from the general partners from time to time upon reasonable demand:

(i)  a copy of any of the partnership records required to be maintained by Section 48-2a-105;

(ii)  true and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership;

(iii)  promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership's federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year; and

(c)  other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the cost of providing the information described in this section shall be the responsibility of the partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

